Utah statutes.
16-16-822.   Appointment and authority of officers.
(1)  A limited cooperative association has the officers:
(a)  provided in the organic rules; or
(b)  established by the board of directors in a manner not inconsistent with
the organic rules.
(2)  The organic rules may designate or, if the rules do not designate, the
board of directors shall designate, one of the association's officers for
preparing all records required by Section 16-16-114 and for the authentication
of records.
(3)  Unless the organic rules otherwise provide, the board of directors shall
appoint the officers of the limited cooperative association.
(4)  Officers of a limited cooperative association shall perform the duties
the organic rules prescribe or as authorized by the board of directors not in
a manner inconsistent with the organic rules.
(5)  The election or appointment of an officer of a limited cooperative
association does not of itself create a contract between the association and
the officer.
(6)  Unless the organic rules otherwise provide, an individual may
simultaneously hold more than one office in a limited cooperative association.
